hu: Kenési követelmény: Karbantartásmentes; Előre kenve; Előre viaszolva; Kenést igényel; Önkenő; Egyéb
fr: Exigences en matière de lubrification: Sans entretien; Pré-lubrifié; Pré-ciré; Nécessite une lubrification; Autolubrifiant; Autre
ko: 윤활 요구 사항: 무보수; 사전 윤활 처리; 사전 왁스 처리; 윤활 필요; 자가 윤활; 기타
bg-BG: Изискване за смазване: Без поддръжка; Предварително смазано; Предварително ваксирано; Изисква смазване; Самосмязващо се; Други
da: Smørekrav: Vedligeholdelsesfri; Forhåndssmurt; Forhåndsvokset; Kræver smøring; Selvsmørende; Andet
it: Requisiti di lubrificazione: Esente da manutenzione; Prelubrificato; Precerato; Richiede lubrificazione; Autolubrificante; Altro
de: Anforderung an die Schmierung: Wartungsfrei; Vorgeschmiert; Vorgewachst; Schmierung erforderlich; Selbstschmierend; Sonstige
es: Requisito de lubricación: Sin mantenimiento; Prelubricado; Preencerado; Requiere lubricación; Autolubricante; Otro
el: Απαιτήσεις λίπανσης: Δεν απαιτεί συντήρηση; Προλιπασμένο; Προκερωμένο; Απαιτεί λίπανση; Αυτολιπαινόμενο; Άλλο
cs: Požadavky na mazání: Bezúdržbové; Předmazané; Předvoskované; Vyžaduje mazání; Samomazné; Jiné
ru: Требование к смазке: Не требует обслуживания; Предварительно смазано; Предварительно навощено; Требует смазки; Самосмазывающееся; Другое
tr: Yağlama gereksinimi: Bakım gerektirmez; Önceden yağlanmış; Önceden mumlanmış; Yağlama gerektirir; Kendinden yağlamalı; Diğer
lt-LT: Tepimo reikalavimas: Nereikalauja priežiūros; Iš anksto sutepta; Iš anksto nuvaškuota; Reikalingas sutepimas; Savaime sutepama; Kita
nl: Smering vereiste: Onderhoudsvrij; Voorgesmeerd; Voorgewaxt; Vereist smering; Zelfsmerend; Anders
vi: Yêu cầu bôi trơn: Không cần bảo trì; Tra dầu mỡ sẵn; Bôi sáp sẵn; Cần bôi trơn; Tự bôi trơn; Khác
fi: Voiteluvaatimus: Huoltovapaa; Esivoideltu; Esivahattu; Vaatii voitelun; Itsevoiteleva; Muu
pt-PT: Requisito de lubrificação: Sem manutenção; Pré-lubrificado; Pré-encerado; Requer lubrificação; Autolubrificante; Outro
pt-BR: Lubrificação requisito: Livre de manutenção; Pré-lubrificado; Pré-encerado; Requer lubrificação; Autolubrificante; Outro
ja: 潤滑要件: メンテナンスフリー; 潤滑済み; ワックス塗布済み; 要潤滑; 自己潤滑性; その他
sk-SK: Požiadavka na mazanie: Bezúdržbové; Vopred premazané; Vopred navoskované; Vyžaduje mazanie; Samomazné; Iné
sv: Smörjningskrav: Underhållsfri; Färdigsmord; Förvaxad; Kräver smörjning; Självsmörjande; Annat
sl-SI: Zahteva po mazanju: Brez vzdrževanja; Predhodno podmazano; Predhodno voskano; Potrebuje podmazovanje; Samopodmazovalno; Drugo
nb: Smørekrav: Vedlikeholdsfri; Forhåndssmurt; Forhåndsvokset; Krever smøring; Selvsmørende; Annet
zh-CN: 润滑要求: 免维护; 预润滑; 预打蜡; 需要润滑; 自润滑; 其他
th: ข้อกำหนดการหล่อลื่น: ไม่ต้องบำรุงรักษา; หล่อลื่นล่วงหน้า; แว็กซ์ล่วงหน้า; ต้องใช้สารหล่อลื่น; หล่อลื่นในตัว; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Cerința de lubrifiere: Fără întreținere; Prelubrifiat; Preceruit; Necesită lubrifiere; Autolubrifiant; Altele
en: Lubrication requirement: Maintenance-free; Pre-lubricated; Pre-waxed; Requires lubrication; Self-lubricating; Other
pl: Wymóg smarowania: Bezobsługowe; Nasmarowane fabrycznie; Nawoskowane fabrycznie; Wymaga smarowania; Samosmarujące; Inne
zh-TW: 潤滑要求: 免維護; 預潤滑; 預上蠟; 需要潤滑; 自潤滑; 其他
hr-HR: Zahtjev za podmazivanje: Bez održavanja; Unaprijed podmazano; Unaprijed navošteno; Zahtijeva podmazivanje; Samopodmazujuće; Ostalo